Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1366.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706.2 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706.2. Elk hunting licenses.* * *(e) Transfer.--(1) A recipient selected to receive a license under subsection (b) or (c) may transfer the license to an eligible hunter as provided under this subsection.(2) The commission shall provide for the form and manner in which a license may be transferred under this subsection, including the manner in which a transferee must prove that the transferee meets the requirements of this subsection.(3) The transfer of a license under this subsection may 123456789101112131415161718 not result in monetary gain. An individual making a transfer may be reimbursed for the cost of the license and any additional cost imposed by the commission for the transfer.(4) An individual transferring a license or receiving a transferred license in violation of this subsection shall be subject to all of the following:(i) A civil penalty of $10,000.(ii) The s uspension of each privilege granted by this title for a period of five years.(iii) A permanent ban from applying for an elk license.(iv) The loss of accumulated bonus or preference points by the recipient of a license under this section.(v) The confiscation of any animal taken.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1366PN1560 - 2 - 123456789101112131415